New York, session 2025-2026, A10057.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 2 of section 503 of the vehi- 2 cle and traffic law is amended by adding a new subparagraph (v) to read 3 as follows: 4 (v) The renewal fee for a license for any person who is sixty-two 5 years of age or older shall be waived. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06905-01-5